Texas statutes.
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CODE

TITLE 3. LICENSES AND PERMITS

SUBTITLE A. PERMITS

Text of chapter effective on September 1, 2021

CHAPTER 29. RETAILER LATE HOURS CERTIFICATE

Sec. 29.01. ELIGIBLE PERMIT AND LICENSE HOLDERS. A retailer late hours certificate may be issued to the holder of a mixed beverage permit, private club registration permit, or retail dealer's on-premise license.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 433, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 123, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 29.02. AUTHORIZED ACTIVITIES. The holder of a retailer late hours certificate may sell or serve the alcoholic beverages the holder is authorized to sell or serve under its primary permit or license on Sunday between the hours of 1:00 a.m. and 2 a.m. and on any other day between the hours of 12 midnight and 2 a.m. if the premises covered by the license or permit are in an area where the sale or service of those alcoholic beverages during those hours is authorized by this code.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 433, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977. Amended by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 1346, ch. 278, Sec. 20, eff. Sept. 1, 1983.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 123, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 29.03. ISSUANCE OF CERTIFICATE AUTHORIZED FOR CERTAIN AREAS. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, a retailer late hours certificate may be issued to the holder of a retail dealer's on-premise license in an area in which the voters have approved the following alcoholic beverage ballot issues in a local option election:

(1) either:

(A) "The legal sale of beer and wine for off-premise consumption only."; or

(B) "The legal sale of malt beverages and wine for off-premise consumption only."; and

(2) either:

(A) "The legal sale of mixed beverages."; or

(B) "The legal sale of mixed beverages in restaurants by food and beverage certificate holders only."

(b) A premises that qualifies for a certificate under this chapter because it is located in an area that approved the ballot issue described by Subsection (a)(2)(B) may be issued a certificate under this chapter only if the premises is issued a food and beverage certificate.

Acts 1977, 65th Leg., p. 433, ch. 194, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1977.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 123, eff. September 1, 2021.